New Jersey, session 221, S4209.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.2C:52-2 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-2.     Indictable Offenses. a.     In all cases, except as herein provided, a person may present an expungement application to the Superior Court pursuant to this section if: the person has been convicted of one [crime] or more crimes under the laws of this State, [and does not otherwise have] notwithstanding any subsequent conviction for another crime in addition to the one or more convictions included in the expungement application, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction. Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the criminal conviction that is the subject of the application; or [the person has been convicted of one crime and no more than three disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, and does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another crime, or any subsequent conviction for another disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense such that the total number of convictions for disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses would exceed three, whether any such crime or offense conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction. Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the one criminal conviction and no more than three convictions for disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses that are the subject of the application; or] the person has been convicted of [multiple crimes or] a combination of one or more crimes and one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, [all of which are listed in a single judgment of conviction, and does not otherwise have] notwithstanding any subsequent conviction for another crime or offense in addition to [those] the convictions included in the expungement application, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction.  Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense that is not listed in a single judgment of conviction shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions listed in a single judgment of conviction that are the subject of the application[; or the person has been convicted of multiple crimes or a combination of one or more crimes and one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, which crimes or combination of crimes and offenses were interdependent or closely related in circumstances and were committed as part of a sequence of events that took place within a comparatively short period of time, regardless of the date of conviction or sentencing for each individual crime or offense, and the person does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another crime or offense in addition to those convictions included in the expungement application, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction. Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense that was not interdependent or closely related in circumstances and was not committed within a comparatively short period of time as described above shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions of crimes or crimes and offenses that were interdependent or closely related and committed within a comparatively short period of time, and that are the subject of the application]. For purposes of determining eligibility to present an expungement application to the Superior Court pursuant to this section, a conviction for unlawful distribution of, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or a lesser amount of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of that section, or a violation of either of those paragraphs and a violation of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) or subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35-7.1), for distributing, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, on or within 1,000 feet of any school property, or on or within 500 feet of the real property comprising a public housing facility, public park, or public building, or for obtaining or possessing marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or for an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction of a crime within this State or any other jurisdiction but shall instead be considered a conviction of a disorderly persons offense within this State or an equivalent category of offense within the other jurisdiction, and a conviction for obtaining, possessing, using, being under the influence of, or failing to make lawful disposition of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (4) of subsection a., or subsection b., or subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or a violation involving marijuana or hashish as described herein and using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia with that marijuana or hashish in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2, or for an equivalent crime or offense in another jurisdiction, regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction within this State or any other jurisdiction. The person, if eligible, may present the expungement application after the expiration of a period of five years from the date of the persons most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later.  The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein and throughout this section means and includes any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the conviction or convictions that are the subject of the application, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes. The person shall submit the expungement application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which [one or more of the persons convictions were] the most recent criminal conviction was adjudged, which includes a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7 praying that the conviction, or convictions if applicable, and all records and information pertaining thereto be expunged.  The petition appended to an application shall comply with the requirements set forth in N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. Notwithstanding the provisions concerning the five-year time requirement, if, at the time of application, a court-ordered financial assessment subject to collection under the comprehensive enforcement program established pursuant to P.L.1995, c.9 (C.2B:19-1 et al.) is not yet satisfied due to reasons other than willful noncompliance, but the time requirement of five years is otherwise satisfied, the person may submit the expungement application and the court may grant an expungement; provided, however, that if expungement is granted the court shall enter a civil judgment for the unpaid portion of the court-ordered financial assessment in the name of the Treasurer, State of New Jersey and transfer collections and disbursement responsibility to the State Treasurer for the outstanding amount in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2017, c.244 (C.2C:52-23.1).  The Treasurer may specify, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with, the technical and informational standards required to effectuate the transfer of the collection and disbursement responsibilities. Notwithstanding any provision in this law or any other law to the contrary, the court shall have sole discretion to amend the judgment. Additionally, an application may be filed and presented, and the court may grant an expungement pursuant to this section, although less than five years have expired in accordance with the time requirements when the court finds: (1)   the court-ordered financial assessment is satisfied but less than five years have expired from the date of satisfaction, and the time requirement of five years is otherwise satisfied, and the court finds that the person substantially complied with any payment plan ordered pursuant to N.J.S.2C:46-1 et seq., or could not do so due to compelling circumstances affecting the persons ability to satisfy the assessment; or (2)   at least four but less than five years have expired from the date of the most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later; and the person has not been otherwise convicted of a crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense since the time of the most recent conviction; and the court finds in its discretion that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement.  The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. In determining whether compelling circumstances exist for the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a court may consider any relevant information provided by the person submitting the application and the prosecutor, including the amount of any court-ordered financial assessment imposed, the person's age at the time of the offense or offenses, the person's financial condition and other relevant circumstances regarding the person's ability to pay.  However, regarding a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection or a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to any other part of this section, the person shall not be required to provide transcripts of plea or sentencing proceedings, or be required to provide any presentence reports with the application or any other filing. b.    Records of conviction pursuant to statutes repealed by this Code for the crimes of murder, manslaughter, treason, anarchy, kidnapping, rape, forcible sodomy, arson, perjury, false swearing, robbery, embracery, or a conspiracy or any attempt to commit any of the foregoing, or aiding, assisting or concealing persons accused of the foregoing crimes, shall not be expunged. Records of conviction for the following crimes specified in the New Jersey Code of Criminal Justice shall not be subject to expungement: N.J.S.2C:11-1 et seq. (Criminal Homicide), except death by auto as specified in N.J.S.2C:11-5 and strict liability vehicular homicide as specified in section 1 of P.L.2017, c.165 (C.2C:11-5.3); N.J.S.2C:13-1 (Kidnapping); section 1 of P.L.1993, c.291 (C.2C:13-6) (Luring or Enticing); section 1 of P.L.2005, c.77 (C.2C:13-8) (Human Trafficking); N.J.S.2C:14-2 (Sexual Assault or Aggravated Sexual Assault); subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:14-3 (Aggravated Criminal Sexual Contact); if the victim is a minor, subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:14-3 (Criminal Sexual Contact); if the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim, N.J.S.2C:13-2 (Criminal Restraint) or N.J.S.2C:13-3 (False Imprisonment); N.J.S.2C:15-1 (Robbery); N.J.S.2C:17-1 (Arson and Related Offenses); subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Endangering the welfare of a child by engaging in sexual conduct which would impair or debauch the morals of the child, or causing the child other harm); paragraph (4) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Photographing or filming a child in a prohibited sexual act or for portrayal in a sexually suggestive manner); paragraph (3) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Causing or permitting a child to engage in a prohibited sexual act or the simulation of an act, or to be portrayed in a sexually suggestive manner); subparagraph (a) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Distributing, possessing with intent to distribute or using a file-sharing program to store items depicting the sexual exploitation or abuse of a child); subparagraph (b) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Possessing or viewing items depicting the sexual exploitation or abuse of a child); section 8 of P.L.2017, c.141 (C.2C:24-4.1) (Leader of a network to share child sexual abuse or exploitation material); N.J.S.2C:28-1 (Perjury); N.J.S.2C:28-2 (False Swearing); paragraph (4) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:34-1 (Knowingly promoting the prostitution of the actor's child); section 2 of P.L.2002, c.26 (C.2C:38-2) (Terrorism); subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.2002, c.26 (C.2C:38-3) (Producing or Possessing Chemical Weapons, Biological Agents or Nuclear or Radiological Devices); and conspiracies or attempts to commit such crimes. Records of conviction for any crime committed by a person holding any public office, position or employment, elective or appointive, under the government of this State or any agency or political subdivision thereof and any conspiracy or attempt to commit such a crime shall not be subject to expungement if the crime involved or touched such office, position or employment. c.     In the case of conviction for the sale or distribution of a controlled dangerous substance or possession thereof with intent to sell, expungement shall be denied except where the crimes involve: (1)   Marijuana, where the total quantity sold, distributed or possessed with intent to sell was less than one ounce; (2)   Hashish, where the total quantity sold, distributed or possessed with intent to sell was less than five grams; or (3)   Any controlled dangerous substance [provided that the conviction is of the third or fourth degree], where the court finds that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement.  The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. d.    In the case of a State licensed physician or podiatrist convicted of an offense involving drugs or alcohol or pursuant to section 14 or 15 of P.L.1989, c.300 (C.2C:21-20 or 2C:21-4.1), the petitioner shall notify the State Board of Medical Examiners upon filing an application for expungement and provide the board with a copy thereof.  The petitioner shall also provide to the court a certification attesting that the requirements of this subsection were satisfied.  Failure to satisfy the requirements of this subsection shall be grounds for denial of the expungement application and, if applicable, administrative discipline by the board. (cf: P.L.2024, c.92, s.9) 2.  N.J.S.2C:52-3 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-3.     Disorderly persons offenses and petty disorderly persons offenses. a.     [(1) Any person who has been convicted of one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State who has not been convicted of any crime, whether within this State or any other jurisdiction, may present an expungement application to a court pursuant to this section. (2) Any person who has been convicted of one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State who has also been convicted of one or more crimes shall not be eligible to apply for an expungement pursuant to this section, but may present an expungement application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged, pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-2.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    [Any] In all cases, except as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-2, a person [who has been convicted of one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State who has not been convicted of any crime, whether within this State or any other jurisdiction,] may present an expungement application pursuant to this section to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged if: the person has been convicted [, under the laws of this State, on the same or separate occasions] of [no] one or more [than five] disorderly persons offenses, [no more than five] one or more petty disorderly persons offenses, or a combination of [no more than five] one or more disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses, [and the person does not otherwise have] notwithstanding any subsequent conviction for a disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense in addition to the one or more convictions included in the expungement application, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction [, such that the total number of convictions for disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses would exceed five.  Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another disorderly persons offense or petty disorderly persons offense shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions that are the subject of the application, which may include convictions for no more than five disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses, or combination thereof; or the person has been convicted of multiple disorderly persons offenses or multiple petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, or a combination of multiple disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, which convictions were entered on the same day, and does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another offense in addition to those convictions included in the expungement application, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction.  Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense that was not entered on the same day shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions entered on the same day that are the subject of the application; or the person has been convicted of multiple disorderly persons offenses or multiple petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, or a combination of multiple disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, which offenses or combination of offenses were interdependent or closely related in circumstances and were committed as part of a sequence of events that took place within a comparatively short period of time, regardless of the date of conviction or sentencing for each individual offense, and the person does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another offense in addition to those convictions included in the expungement application, whether within this State or any other jurisdiction]. Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another disorderly persons offense or petty disorderly persons offense that was not interdependent or closely related in circumstances and was not committed within a comparatively short period of time as described above shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions of offenses that were interdependent or closely related and committed within a comparatively short period of time, and that are the subject of the application. For purposes of determining eligibility to present an expungement application to the court pursuant to this section, a conviction for unlawful distribution of, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5,or a lesser amount of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of that section, or a violation of either of those paragraphs and a violation of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) or subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35-7.1), for distributing, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, on or within 1,000 feet of any school property, or on or within 500 feet of the real property comprising a public housing facility, public park, or public building, or for obtaining or possessing marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or for an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction of a crime within this State or any other jurisdiction but shall instead be considered a conviction of a disorderly persons offense within this State or an equivalent category of offense within the other jurisdiction, and a conviction for obtaining, possessing, using, being under the influence of, or failing to make lawful disposition of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (4) of subsection a., or subsection b., or subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or a violation involving marijuana or hashish as described herein and using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia with that marijuana or hashish in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2, or for an equivalent crime or offense in another jurisdiction, regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction within this State or any other jurisdiction. Additionally, for purposes of determining eligibility to present an expungement application to the court pursuant to this section, a conviction for unlawful distribution or dispensing of, possession with intent to distribute or dispense, or manufacture with intent to distribute or dispense, drug paraphernalia in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-3 when the paraphernalia is a hypodermic syringe or needle, or for an equivalent crime involving a hypodermic syringe or needle in another jurisdiction, regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction of a crime within this State or any other jurisdiction but shall instead be considered a conviction of a disorderly persons offense within this State or an equivalent category of offense within the other jurisdiction, and a conviction for using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2 when the paraphernalia is a hypodermic syringe or needle, or possession with intent to use or to distribute a hypodermic syringe or needle in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-6, of for an equivalent crime or offense in another jurisdiction, regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction within this State or any other jurisdiction. The person, if eligible, may present the expungement application after the expiration of a period of five years from the date of his most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later.  The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein and throughout this section means and includes any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the conviction or convictions that are the subject of the application, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes.  The person shall submit the expungement application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged, which includes a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7 praying that the conviction, or convictions if applicable, and all records and information pertaining thereto be expunged.  The petition appended to an application shall comply with the requirements of N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. Notwithstanding the provisions of the five-year time requirement, if, at the time of application, a court-ordered financial assessment subject to collection under the comprehensive enforcement program established pursuant to P.L.1995, c.9 (C.2B:19-1 et al.) is not yet satisfied due to reasons other than willful noncompliance, but the time requirement of five years is otherwise satisfied, the person may submit the expungement application and the court may grant an expungement; provided, however, that the court shall enter a civil judgment for the unpaid portion of the court-ordered financial assessment in the name of the Treasurer, State of New Jersey and transfer collections and disbursement responsibility to the State Treasurer for the outstanding amount in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2017, c.244 (C.2C:52-23.1).  The Treasurer may specify, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with, the technical and informational standards required to effectuate the transfer of the collection and disbursement responsibilities. Notwithstanding any provision in this law or any other law to the contrary, the court shall have sole discretion to amend the judgment. Additionally, an application may be filed and presented, and the court may grant an expungement pursuant to this section, although less than five years have expired in accordance with the time requirements when the court finds: (1)   the court-ordered financial assessment is satisfied but less than five years have expired from the date of satisfaction, and the five-year time requirement is otherwise satisfied, and the court finds that the person substantially complied with any payment plan ordered pursuant to N.J.S.2C:46-1 et seq., or could not do so due to compelling circumstances affecting his ability to satisfy the assessment; or (2)   at least three but less than five years have expired from the date of the most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later; and the person has not been otherwise convicted of a crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense since the time of the most recent conviction; and the court finds in its discretion that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement.  The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. In determining whether compelling circumstances exist for the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a court may consider any relevant information provided by the person submitting the application and the prosecutor, including the amount of any court-ordered financial assessment imposed, the person's age at the time of the offense or offenses, the person's financial condition and other relevant circumstances regarding the person's ability to pay.  However, regarding a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection or a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to any other part of this section, the person shall not be required to provide transcripts of plea or sentencing proceedings, or be required to provide any presentence reports with the application or any other filing. (cf: P.L.2023, c.260, s.2) 3.  N.J.S.2C:52-4 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-4. Ordinances. In all cases wherein a person has been found guilty of violating a municipal  ordinance of any governmental entity of this State [and who has not been  convicted of] notwithstanding any prior or subsequent conviction for a crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense, whether within this State or any  other jurisdiction, [ and who has not been adjudged a disorderly person or petty disorderly person on more than two occasions,] may, after the expiration of a  period of [2] two years from the date of his conviction, payment of fine, satisfactory completion of probation or release from incarceration, whichever is later, present a duly verified petition as provided in [section] N.J.S.2C:52-7 [herein] to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged praying that such conviction and all records and information pertaining thereto  be expunged. (cf: P.L.2023, c.260, s.4) 4.  N.J.S.2C:52-5 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-5. Expungement of Records of Young Drug Offenders. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:52-2 and N.J.S.2C:52-3, after a period of not less than one year following conviction, termination of probation or parole or discharge from custody, whichever is later, any person convicted of an offense under chapter 35 or 36 of this title for the possession or use of a controlled dangerous substance, convicted of violating P.L.1955, c.77, s.3 (C.2A:170-77.5), or convicted of violating P.L.1962, c.113, s.1 (C.2A:170-77.8), and who at the time of the offense was 21 years of age or younger, may apply to the Superior Court in the county wherein the person resides or the county in which the persons conviction was disposed of for the expungement of such person's conviction and all records pertaining thereto.  [The relief of expungement under this section shall be granted only if said person has not, prior to the time of hearing, violated any of the conditions of his probation or parole, albeit subsequent to discharge from probation or parole, has not been convicted of any previous or subsequent criminal act or any previous or subsequent violation of chapter 35 or 36 of this title or of P.L.1955, c.277, s.3 (C.2A:170-77.5) or of P.L.1962, c.113, s.1 (C.2A:170-77.8), or who has not had a prior or subsequent criminal matter dismissed because of acceptance into a supervisory treatment or other diversion program.] This section shall not apply to any person who has been convicted of the sale or distribution of a controlled dangerous substance or possession with the intent to sell any controlled dangerous substance except: (1)   [Marihuana] Marijuana, where the total sold, distributed or possessed with intent to sell was less than one ounce, or (2)   Hashish, where the total amount sold, distributed or possessed with intent to sell was less than five grams. (cf: P.L.2023, c.260, s.5) 5.    N.J.S.2C:52-8 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-8.     Statements to accompany petition.  There shall be attached to a petition for expungement: a.     A statement with the affidavit or verification that there are no disorderly persons, petty disorderly persons or criminal charges pending against the petitioner at the time of filing of the petition for expungement. b.    [In those instances where the petitioner is seeking the expungement of a criminal conviction pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-2, a statement with affidavit or verification that he has never been granted expungement, sealing or similar relief regarding a criminal conviction by any court in this State or other state or by any Federal court. "Sealing" refers to the relief previously granted pursuant to P.L.1973, c.191 (C.2A:85-15 et seq.).] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.     In those instances where a person has received a dismissal of a criminal charge because of acceptance into a supervisory treatment or any other diversion program, a statement with affidavit or verification setting forth the nature of the original charge, the court of disposition and date of disposition. d.    A statement as to whether the petitioner has legally changed the petitioner's name, the date of judgment of name change, and the previous legal name.  If applicable, the petitioner shall provide a copy of the order for name change. (cf: P.L.2019, s.269, s.9) 6.    N.J.S.2C:52-14 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-14.   A petition for expungement filed pursuant to this chapter shall be denied when: a.     Any statutory prerequisite, including any provision of this chapter, is not fulfilled or there is any other statutory basis for denying relief. b.    The need for the availability of the records outweighs the desirability of having a person freed from any disabilities as otherwise provided in this chapter.  An application may be denied under this subsection only following objection of a party given notice pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-10 and the burden of asserting such grounds shall be on the objector. c.     In connection with a petition under N.J.S.2C:52-6, the acquittal, discharge or dismissal of charges resulted from a plea bargaining agreement involving the conviction of other charges.  This bar, however, shall not apply once the conviction is itself expunged. d.    The arrest or conviction sought to be expunged is, at the time of hearing, the subject matter of civil litigation between the petitioner or his legal representative and the State, any governmental entity thereof or any State agency and the representatives or employees of any such body. e.     [Except as set forth in subsection a. of section 7 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-5.3) concerning a "clean slate" expungement petition, the person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged regardless of the lapse of time between the prior expungement, or sealing under prior law, and the present petition.  This provision shall not apply: (1)   When the person is seeking the expungement of a municipal ordinance violation, (2)   When the person is seeking the expungement of records pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-6, or (3)   When the person is seeking the expungement of records of conviction for possession with intent to use drug paraphernalia pursuant to N.J.S.2C:36-2, when same is a hypodermic syringe or needle; possession with the intent to distribute drug paraphernalia pursuant to N.J.S.2C:36-3, when same is a hypodermic syringe or needle; or possession or distribution of hypodermic syringe or needle pursuant to N.J.S.2C:36-6.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). f.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2017, c.244) (cf: P.L.2021, c.403, s.2) 7.    N.J.S.2C:52-32 is repealed. 8.    This act shall take effect immediately, and apply to any expungement relief granted to any person thereafter, regardless of whether that person was previously granted an expungement.